Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.320

Fees and other income—Deposit—Disbursement.

All operating fees, services and activities fees, and all other income which the trustees are authorized to impose shall be deposited as the trustees may direct unless otherwise provided by law. Such sums of money shall be subject to the budgetary and audit provisions of law applicable to state agencies. The depository selected by the trustees shall conform to the collateral requirements required for deposit of other state funds.

Disbursement shall be made by check signed by the president of the college or the president's designee appointed in writing, and such other person as may be designated by the board of trustees of the college district. Each person authorized to sign as provided above, shall execute a surety bond as provided in RCW 43.17.100. Said bond or bonds shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1991 c 238 s 47; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 17; 1970 ex.s. c 59 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 238 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.320. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 32.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.

Severability—1970 ex.s. c 59: See note following RCW 28B.15.520.